District of Columbia statutes.
42-2132

Development of an Affordable Housing Inventory and an Affordable Housing Locator.

(a)

To assist residents of the District in locating affordable housing units within the District, the Mayor, or the Mayor’s designee, shall develop and maintain the Affordable Housing Inventory.

(b)

(1)

The Mayor shall create the Affordable Housing Locator using the Affordable Housing Inventory.

(2)

The Mayor shall make the Affordable Housing Locator available and accessible to the general public by all appropriate means, including the internet.

(c)

(1)

The Mayor shall provide copies of the Affordable Housing Locator to each of the following offices and entities:

(A)

The Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development;

(B)

The Office of Planning;

(C)

The District of Columbia Housing Authority;

(D)

The District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency;

(E)

The Department of Housing and Community Development; and

(F)

The District of Columbia Public Library.

(2)

The Mayor shall provide updated copies to the offices and entities listed in this subsection on a quarterly basis.

Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-215, § 3, 55 DCR 7494
This section is referenced in § 42-2135.